Nebraska, session 109, LB481.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB481 LB481
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 5 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Foster Child Scholarships Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Foster Child Scholarships Act:
(1) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;
(2) Educational decisionmaker means a parent, guardian, foster care
parent, or other person with the authority to make educational decisions
for a child;
(3) Eligible student means any elementary or secondary school
student who was eligible to attend a public school in the preceding
semester or is starting school for the first time and is in foster care
or is the biological sibling of a foster child;
(4) Eligible school means any nongovernmental, privately operated
elementary or secondary school located in this state that (i) is operated
not for profit, (ii) complies with the antidiscrimination provisions of
42 U.S.C. 1981, as such section existed on January 1, 2025, (iii)
complies with all health and safety laws or codes that apply to privately
operated schools, and (iv) fulfills the applicable accreditation or
approval requirements established by the State Board of Education
pursuant to section 79-318; and
(5) HOPE Scholarship means a financial grant-in-aid to be used to
pay all or part of the cost to educate an eligible student attending an
eligible school.
Sec. 3. (1) The department shall establish the Foster Child
Scholarship Program to provide HOPE Scholarships to eligible students to
pay the costs associated with attending an eligible school beginning with
the 2025-26 school year.
(2)(a) An educational decisionmaker of an eligible student shall
qualify for a HOPE Scholarship for a foster child to enroll in and attend
an eligible school, upon being accepted for admission at a participating
school.
(b) An eligible student shall retain program eligibility regardless
-2-

LB481 LB481
2025 2025
of subsequent placement out of the foster care system and until the
eligible student's graduation from high school or the date the eligible
student is twenty-one years of age, whichever comes first.
(3) The Foster Child Scholarships Act shall not be construed to
grant any expanded or additional authority to the State of Nebraska to
control or influence the governance or policies of any eligible school
due to the fact that the eligible school admits and enrolls students who
receive HOPE Scholarships or as requiring any eligible school to admit or
to continue enrollment of any student receiving a HOPE Scholarship.
(4) The department shall annually notify educational decisionmakers
about the Foster Child Scholarship Act, in order to increase awareness
and eligibility of potential beneficiaries.
(5) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
carry out the Foster Child Scholarships Act.
Sec. 4. On or before December 1, 2026, and on or before December 1
of each year thereafter, the department shall electronically submit a
report to the Governor and the Legislature that includes:
(1) The number of eligible students receiving a HOPE Scholarship in
the most recent fiscal year;
(2) The total amount of HOPE Scholarships awarded in the most recent
fiscal year; and
(3) Demographic information for eligible students receiving HOPE
Scholarships including, but not limited to: (a) Income level; (b) grade
level; (c) race and ethnicity; and (d) geographic location.
Sec. 5. It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate two
hundred thousand dollars from the General Fund for fiscal years 2025-26
and 2026-27 to the department to carry out the Foster Child Scholarships
Act.
Sec. 6. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-3-